Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.105.050

Repayment obligation—Conditions.

(1) A recipient of a GET ready for math and science scholarship incurs an obligation to repay the scholarship, with interest and an equalization fee, if he or she does not:

(a) Graduate with a bachelor's degree from a qualified program or in a qualified major within five years of first enrolling at an institution of higher education; and

(b) Work in Washington in a mathematics, science, or related occupation full time for at least three years following completion of a bachelor's degree, unless he or she is enrolled in a graduate degree program as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

(2) A former scholarship recipient who has earned a bachelor's degree shall annually verify to the office that he or she is working full time in a mathematics, science, or related field for three years.

(3) If a former scholarship recipient begins but then stops working full time in a mathematics, science, or related field within three years following completion of a bachelor's degree, he or she shall pay back a prorated portion of the amount of the GET ready for math and science scholarship award received by the recipient, plus interest and a prorated equalization fee.

(4) A recipient may postpone for up to three years his or her in-state work obligation if he or she enrolls full time in a graduate degree program in mathematics, science, or a related field.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 185; 2007 c 214 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.